North Dakota, session 69, SB2067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 12.1-32-06.1 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. Except as provided in this section, the length of supervised probation imposed in conjunction
with a sentence of probation or a suspended execution or deferred imposition of sentence
may not extend for more than five years for a felony offense subject to section 12.1-32-09.1, a
felony offense subject to section 12.1-32-02.1, which involves the use of a firearm or
dangerous weapon, a second or subsequent violation of section 12.1-17-07.1, a second or
subsequent violation of any domestic violence protection order, a violation of chapter 12.1-41,
or a violation of section 14-09-22; three years for any other felony offense; two years for a
class A misdemeanor; and three hundred sixty days for a class B misdemeanor offense from
the later of the date of:
a. The order imposing probation;
b. The defendant's release from incarceration or an alternative to incarceration; or
c. Termination of the defendant's parole.

S. B. NO. 2067 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2067.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State